Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB93.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 148.280 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The commission:
(a) Shall have the authority and control of such property as now is under its
custody and control, and of such property as may hereafter be placed under its
control or transferred to it by the State Property and Buildings Commission,
for any purpose mentioned in this section;
(b) May erect and repair buildings on the Kentucky Horse Park and make any and
all necessary or proper improvements, and generally carry on a program of
development and extension of facilities designed to accomplish the objectives
defined in this section; and
(c) Shall promote the progress of the state and stimulate public interest in the
advancement and development of the state by providing the facilities of the
Kentucky Horse Park for exhibitionary, competitive, and other events relative
to various aspects of the horse industry and other functions calculated to
advance and enhance the tourist industry, economy, entertainment, cultural,
and educational interests of the public.
(2) The commission may take, acquire, and hold property, and all interest herein, by
deed, gift, devise, bequest, lease, or by transfer from the state property so acquired
in the manner provided by law, and may dispose of any property so acquired in the
manner provided by law.
(3) The commission may promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with
KRS Chapter 13A to govern the operation, maintenance, or use of property under
its custody and control, as are necessary to:
(a) Maintain decency and good order;
(b) Protect the peace or safety of the general public;
Page 1 of 2
XXXX 1/5/2026 3:26 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 868
(c) Protect the public interest, convenience, or necessity;[ and]
(d) Govern the operation, maintenance, or use of the Kentucky Horse Park; and
(e) Exercise the authority granted in subsection (4)(d) of this section.
(4) The commission may:
(a) Employ or contract with other persons, firms, or corporations the commission
may deem necessary or desirable to accomplish its duties and functions; may
fix the compensation and the terms of employment or contract of those
employed or contracted with; and may assign to them duties and
responsibilities the commission may determine, including the responsibility of
actual operation of any or all of the facilities under the control of the
commission;
(b) Purchase liability insurance for the members and executive officers exempted
from the classified service of the state by KRS 18A.115;[ and]
(c) Operate shows and expositions that support the purpose and function of the
Kentucky Horse Park; and
(d) Through the president, eject or exclude from Kentucky Horse Park property
any person:
1. Whose participation in Olympic, Paralympic, or equestrian sports or
activities has been restricted by the United States Center for
SafeSport; or
2. Who engages or has engaged in conduct that would negatively impact
the safety and security of park attendees.
Page 2 of 2
XXXX 1/5/2026 3:26 PM Jacketed